Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

Persons with Severe Impairments

33-6-301. “Severe impairment” defined.

For purposes of this part, unless the context requires otherwise, “severe impairment” means a condition in which an adult or an emancipated child:

As a result of a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance:

Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from the person's failure to provide for the person's essential human needs of health or safety; or

Manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over the person's actions; and

Is not receiving care that is essential for the person's health or safety.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable to title, § 33-1-101.

33-6-302. Detention of persons with severe impairments — Record.

No person shall be detained under this part except in a treatment resource that provides psychiatric services, twenty-four hour crisis services, and supervised observation beds, participates in mandatory prescreening authority under § 33-6-104, and is approved by the department for service under this part. The chief officer may detain a person alleged to:

Have a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance for which immediate observation, care and treatment in the program is appropriate; and

To be experiencing severe impairment that is likely to result in serious harm to the person.

The chief officer shall have entered on the record the reasons why and with whom the person came to the treatment resource.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-303. Examination of person.

A physician shall examine the person as soon as practicable but at least within six (6) hours after the person arrives at the treatment resource.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-304. Detention following finding of severe impairment.

IF AND ONLY IF

the physician determines that the person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance for which immediate observation, care and treatment in a treatment resource is appropriate, AND

the physician determines that the person is experiencing “severe impairment” that is likely to result in serious harm to the person,

THEN

the person may be detained for observation, care and treatment and further examination for up to twelve (12) hours from the time the person arrived at the treatment resource.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-305. Extended detention after confirmation of initial finding.

IF AND ONLY IF

another physician examines the person and confirms the determination of the first examining physician under § 33-6-304 within twelve (12) hours after the time the person arrived, AND

the person is admitted to an extended observation bed for observation, care, and treatment,

THEN

the person may be detained under this part for up to seventy-two (72) hours from the time the person arrived at the treatment resource.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 37.

33-6-306. Notice of status and rights as service recipient.

At the time of admission to an extended observation bed, the person shall be given written notice of the person's status and rights as a service recipient under this title. The notice shall contain the service recipient's name. The notice shall be provided to the same persons and in the manner as if the service recipient had been admitted under chapter 6, part 4 of this title.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-307. Request for release.

If the person or anyone acting on the person's behalf demands that the person be released and the chief officer does not detain the person in conformity with chapter 6, part 4 or 5 of this title, the chief officer shall discharge the person.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-308. Release of person no longer in need of immediate care.

If at any time it is determined that the person is no longer in need of immediate observation, care and treatment in accordance with this part and is not in need of involuntary care and treatment in a hospital, the person shall be released unless the person agrees to be admitted to a hospital or treatment resource.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-309. Admission of person to treatment facility beyond seventy-two hour period.

If at any time within the seventy-two hour period it is determined that the person continues to require immediate observation, assessment, and treatment in accordance with this part and that the requirement is likely to continue beyond the seventy-two hour period, the person shall be moved immediately to an appropriate hospital or treatment resource authorized to receive and detain persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance under chapter 6, part 4 of this title. The person shall be evaluated for admission and, if appropriate, shall be admitted in accordance with chapter 6, part 4 of this title, and if the person is so admitted, the fifteen-day retention period of chapter 6, part 4 of this title, shall be reduced by the number of days the person was detained under this part. Any person moved to a hospital pursuant to this section shall be moved without regard to the transfer provisions of this title. Evaluation for admission to a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource must conform to § 33-6-105.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 38.

33-6-310. Monitoring of admissions to ensure service recipients' rights.

The department shall monitor admissions under this part to assure that they are not used in any way that violates the rights of service recipients with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 39.

33-6-311. Service under this part not substitute for outpatient care.

Service under this part shall not be used instead of assessment or evaluation that can be performed on an outpatient basis.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.